Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.610

First-class districts having city with population of 400,000 people or more—Directors' terms.

After July 1, 1979, the election of directors of any first-class school district having within its boundaries a city with a population of four hundred thousand people or more, shall be to four year terms. The initial four year terms required by this section shall commence upon the expiration of terms in existence at July 1, 1979. Nothing in chapter 183, Laws of 1979 ex. sess. shall affect the term of office of any incumbent director of any such first-class school district.

[ 1991 c 363 s 21; 1979 ex.s. c 183 s 10. Formerly RCW 28A.315.460, 28A.57.313.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 183: See notes following RCW 28A.343.020.

Directors—Number and terms of in new first-class district having city with population of 400,000 people or more: RCW 28A.343.650.